Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.180

Pesticide dealer license—Generally.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section, it is unlawful for any person to act in the capacity of a pesticide dealer or advertise as or assume to act as a pesticide dealer without first having obtained an annual license from the director. The license expires on the business license expiration date. A license is required for each location or outlet located within this state from which pesticides are distributed. A manufacturer, registrant, or distributor who has no pesticide dealer outlet licensed within this state and who distributes pesticides directly into this state must obtain a pesticide dealer license for his or her principal out-of-state location or outlet, but such a licensed out-of-state pesticide dealer is exempt from the pesticide dealer manager requirements.

(2) Application for a license must be accompanied by a fee of eighty-eight dollars and must be made through the business licensing system and must include the full name of the person applying for the license and the name of the individual within the state designated as the pesticide dealer manager. If the applicant is a partnership, association, corporation, or organized group of persons, the full name of each member of the firm or partnership or the names of the officers of the association or corporation must be given on the application. The application must state the principal business address of the applicant in the state and elsewhere, the name of a person domiciled in this state authorized to receive and accept service of summons of legal notices of all kinds for the applicant, and any other necessary information prescribed by the director.

(3) It is unlawful for any licensed dealer outlet to operate without a pesticide dealer manager who has a license of qualification.

(4) This section does not apply to (a) a licensed pesticide applicator who sells pesticides only as an integral part of the applicator's pesticide application service when pesticides are dispensed only through apparatuses used for pesticide application, or (b) any federal, state, county, or municipal agency that provides pesticides only for its own programs.

(5) A user of a pesticide may distribute a properly labeled pesticide to another user who is legally entitled to use that pesticide without obtaining a pesticide dealer's license if the exclusive purpose of distributing the pesticide is keeping it from becoming a hazardous waste as defined in chapter 70A.300 RCW.

[ 2021 c 244 s 2; 2021 c 65 s 10; 2013 c 144 s 10; 2008 c 285 s 16; 1997 c 242 s 4; 1989 c 380 s 14; 1983 c 95 s 4; 1982 c 182 s 27; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 18.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2021 c 65 s 10 and by 2021 c 244 s 2, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2021 c 244: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Effective date—2008 c 285 ss 15-26: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Intent—Captions not law—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.

Effective date—1997 c 242: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Business licensing system: Chapter 19.02 RCW.